North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 2E. Transportation Corridor Official Map Act.

§§ 136-44.50 through 136-44.54.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-35, s. 1, effective June 21, 2019.

History.

1987, c. 747, s. 19; 1989, c. 595, s. 1; 1998-184, s. 1; 2005-275, s. 1; 2005-418, s. 9; 2006-237, s. 1; 2008-180, s. 3; 2009-332, ss. 1, 2; 2009-570, s. 44; 2013-183, s. 4.4; 2013-360, s. 34.30; 2015-151, s. 1; 2016-90, s. 16; 2017-57, ss. 34.17A, 34.18; 2018-5, s. 34.9(a); repealed by 2019-35, s. 1, effective June 21, 2019.